Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB211.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-805 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-805. (a) (1) There is hereby created within and as a part of the
department the Kansas wildlife and parks commission, and such
commission shall be composed of seven members who are residents of the
state of Kansas.
(2) Such members shall be appointed as follows:
(A) One at-large member who represents fish and wildlife
administration region one appointed by the governor;
(B) one member appointed by the governor who represents fish and
wildlife administration region one two appointed by the governor;
(C) one member appointed by the governor who represents fish and
wildlife administration region two three appointed by the governor;
(D) one member appointed by the governor who represents fish and
wildlife administration region five four appointed by the governor;
(E) one at-large member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives who represents fish and wildlife administration region
four;
(F) one at-large member appointed by the president of the senate who
represents fish and wildlife administration region three; and
(G) one at-large member appointed by the attorney general.
(3) The members appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, the president of the senate and the attorney general shall
serve an initial term of two years and, thereafter, shall be appointed to a
term of four years.
(4) The appointing authorities for the members of the commission

SB 211—Am. by SCW 2
shall give consideration to the appointment of licensed hunters, fishermen
and furharvesters, park users and to nonconsumptive users of wildlife and
park resources. In no case shall any respective appointing authority
appoint a person who is or, within five years prior to the appointment,
has been a controlled shooting area licensee or any, an employee of such
licensee or any a person who provides hunting outfitting services or
hunting guide services. Not more than a majority of the members shall be
of the same political party. Not more than two{ at-large} members shall
be from the same fish and wildlife administration region.
(4) Except as otherwise provided, each member of the commission
appointed by the governor shall hold office for a term of four years and or
until a successor is appointed and qualified. Each member of the
commission appointed by the attorney general, the speaker of the house
of representatives or the president of the senate shall hold office for a
term of two years or until a successor is appointed and qualified. Each
respective appointing authority shall fill any vacancy on the commission
prior to the expiration of a term by appointment for the unexpired term. On
July 1, 2024, each appointing authority may appoint a new member to
replace the current incumbent holding such incumbent's seat. Otherwise,
such incumbent may serve for the remainder of such incumbent's term. On
July 1, 2026, except for the member appointed to represent fish and
wildlife administration region one, each appointing authority may
appoint a new member to replace the incumbent member holding such
incumbent's seat. Otherwise, such incumbent may serve for the
remainder of such incumbent's term.
(b) Each member of the commission shall take and subscribe an oath
or affirmation as required by law before taking office.
(c) (1) Each respective appointing authorityMembers of the
commission appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and
the president of the senate shall serve at the will of the speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate, respectively.
(2) The governor and the attorney general may remove a
commissioner after opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of the Kansas administrative procedure act. If the commissioner
is removed, the respective appointing authority shall file in the office of
the secretary of state a complete statement of all charges made against
such commissioner and the respective appointing authority's findings
thereon, together with a complete record of the proceedings.
(d) (1) The commission shall have such powers, duties and functions
as prescribed by law and shall preserve the rights guaranteed by section 21
of the bill of rights of the constitution of the state of Kansas.
(2) Other than rules and regulations pertaining to personnel matters of
the department,:

SB 211—Am. by SCW 3
(A) The secretary or members of the commission shall submit to the
commission all proposed rules and regulations; and
(B) members of the commission may submit to the commission any
potential rules and regulations.
(3) The commission may, by a majority vote, direct the secretary to
make a report on or develop any proposed rule and regulation.
(4) {, }the commission shall either approve, modify and approve, or
reject such proposed rules and regulations proposed pursuant to
paragraph (2)(A). The secretary shall adopt such rules and regulations so
approved or so modified and approved.
{(3) Proposed rules and regulations may be developed:
(A) By the secretary;
(B) by a member of the commission; or
(C) through approval of the commission directing the secretary to
develop a specific proposed rule and regulation.}
(5){(4)} Fees established for licenses, permits, stamps and other
issues of the department shall be subject to the approval of the
commission.
(6){(5)} It also shall be the duty of the commission to serve in an
advisory capacity to the governor and the secretary in the formulation of
policies and plans relating to the department.
(e) The members of the commission shall elect one commission
member to serve as chairperson of the commission for a term not to exceed
two years and until a successor has been elected. In the event of a vacancy
in the position of chairperson, the members shall elect a successor for the
remainder of the chairperson's term. Upon the expiration of the
chairperson's two-year term, during the commission's first meeting of the
calendar year, the members shall elect a new chairperson. Members of the
commission attending meetings of the commission, or attending a
subcommittee meeting thereof authorized by the commission, shall be paid
compensation, subsistence allowances, mileage and other expenses as
provided in K.S.A. 75-3223, and amendments thereto. A majority of the
members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of business. Meetings may be called by the chairperson and shall be called
on the request of a majority of the members of the commission.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-805 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.